District of Columbia statutes.
29A-916

Repealed

Voting provisions — Application to voting by mail.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 484, ch. 397, § 16
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-916.
1981 Ed., § 29-1116.
1973 Ed., § 29-816.